Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,128
Extracurricular activities; incidentals furnished by students; authorized.

A governing body may require students to furnish minor personal or minor consumable items for participation in extracurricular activities.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 6.